Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-703
Initiative; personnel; administrative support.

The Department of Health and Human Services will determine how the department will provide personnel to carry out the Women's Health Initiative of Nebraska. The department shall employ personnel, including an executive director, necessary to carry out the powers and duties of the initiative. The Governor's Policy Research Office, the department, and other state agencies as necessary may provide administrative and technical support under the direct supervision of the Governor. The initiative may secure cooperation and assistance of other appropriate government and private-sector entities for women's health issues, programs, and educational materials.

Laws 2000, LB 480, § 3;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 31;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 450.